Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 18 Wildlife Management Areas

20-18-1.
Acquisition or control of land for protecting wildlife.

The director may, in the name and for the use of the state, and subject to the approval of the state properties committee, acquire by gift, lease, purchase, or easement, land within the state for the purpose of protecting, conserving, cultivating, or propagating any species of wildlife, plant, or animal. The director may, with the consent of the owner of the land, control any land suitable with character and situation for those purposes. Any land so acquired or controlled by the department of environmental management shall be posted conspicuously and designated as a state park or management area.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-18-2.
Hunting on land leased or controlled by the department.

It is unlawful for any person at any time to hunt, trap, pursue, take, or kill, or attempt so to do, or in any manner molest or destroy, any wild bird, or the nest or eggs of wild birds, or any wild animal, on land leased or controlled by the department under the authority of §

20-18-1

, except that the director may, in his or her discretion, and with any limitations the director may deem advisable, authorize, in writing, any deputy and/or the owner or occupant of the land, to hunt, pursue, take, or kill any wild bird or animal detrimental to its species or other species, to agriculture or other plant life, or to humans. This authority is revocable at the pleasure of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-18-3.
Hunting on public lands.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt, trap, pursue, take, or kill, or attempt so to do, or in any manner molest or destroy, any wild birds, or the nests or eggs of wild birds, or any wild animal, within the exterior boundaries of any state management area, or park, or land held by any entity in trust for public use, except that the authorities or persons having the control and charge of the lands may in their discretion, with limitations they may deem advisable, and consistent with the laws and rules and regulations of the state relating to seasons, bag and size limits, and manner of taking, authorize persons to hunt, take, or kill within the boundaries any wild birds or animals that are not now protected by law. Authorization is given by written permit, and the permit is revocable at the pleasure of the authorities or persons granting it. The provisions of this section may be enforced by the officials and persons having charge of these lands, and by environmental police officers of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 94, § 1.